District of Columbia statutes.
32-410

Investigations.

(a)

The Mayor may investigate the manner in which all employment agencies, employment counseling services, employer-paid personnel services, and job listing services doing business in the District conduct their businesses, and may examine at any time during business hours any and all books and records of the employment agencies, employment counseling services, employer-paid personnel services, and job listing services to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations issued by the Mayor pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor may further investigate all matters which may aid in the enforcement of this chapter.

Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-136, § 11, 31 DCR 5727
This section is referenced in § 32-409.
1981 Ed., § 36-1010.